New Jersey, session 222, S3435.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Upon application by any person who has been issued a drivers license with a numerical code designating hearing-impairment pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1983, c.493 (C.39:3-11a), the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall issue a corresponding windshield placard for use on a vehicle owned or operated by the applicant.  The windshield placard shall bear the international symbol of the deaf and shall be posted or attached to the motor vehicle in a place and manner to be determined by the chief administrator.  The commission shall not charge a fee for the issuance of the windshield placard. b.    Nothing in this section shall permit a person who uses the windshield placard, issued pursuant to this section, to receive parking privileges reserved for persons with disabilities, unless the person is otherwise eligible to receive those parking privileges and has received a placard or license plate, issued in accordance with P.L.1949, c.280 (C.39:4-204 et seq.). c.     Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S.39:3-74 or any other law, rule, regulation, or order to the contrary, no citation for a violation of law shall be issued and no penalty or fine shall be assessed for operating a motor vehicle with a valid windshield placard, issued pursuant to this section, that is posted or attached in a manner prescribed by the chief administrator. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the thirteenth month after the date of enactment and the Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission may take such administrative action in advance as may be necessary for the timely implementation of this act.